Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-508
Refusal of witness to enter into recognizance or accept conditions; effect.

If any witness required to enter into a recognizance or accept specified conditions for release under section 29-507 refuses to comply with such order, the court shall, subject to the conditions and procedure provided in section 29-508.01, commit him or her to jail until he or she complies with such order or is otherwise discharged according to law.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 305, p. 793;

R.S.1913, § 8959;

C.S.1922, § 9983;

C.S.1929, § 29-508;

R.S.1943, § 29-508;

Laws 1981, LB 228, § 2.